Utah statutes.
78B-12-211.   Limitation on amount of support ordered.
(1)  There is no maximum limit on the base child support award that may be
ordered using the base combined child support obligation table, using the low
income table, or awarding medical expenses except under Subsection (2).
(2)  If amounts under either table as provided in Part 3, Tables, in
combination with the award of medical expenses exceeds 50% of the obligor's
adjusted gross income, or by adding the child care costs, total child support
would exceed 50% of the obligor's adjusted gross income, the presumption under
Section 78B-12-215 is rebutted.
